South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4341.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 57-7-230(1) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (1) Municipalities or counties may, upon roads and streets in residential areas or school zones, construct and maintain speed-control devices as they deem necessary upon the basis of an investigation of the area. Such devices shall consist of a mound, rib or hump with sloping sides, extending across a road or street, and not exceeding six inches in height above the street or road surface. Provided, however, the speed limit in any such area shall be posted at twenty-five thirty miles per hour or less and signs shall be erected warning of the existence of the devices. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----